Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-407
Acceptance of donations or loans; procedures.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska and the chief administrative officer of the University of Nebraska at Kearney shall approve procedures for the acceptance of donations or loans of art that meet the criteria of the Nebraska Art Collection Act.

Laws 1979, LB 116, § 7;

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 15.